Missouri, session 2026, SB1690.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 474, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 474.145, to read as
follows:
474.145. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Disposition or appointment of property", includes
a transfer of an item of property or any other benefit to a
beneficiary designated in a governing instrument;
(2) "Governing instrument", a governing instrument
executed by the decedent;
(3) "Revocable", with respect to a disposition,
appointment, provision, or nomination, one under which the
decedent, at the time of or immediately before death, was
alone empowered, by law or under the governing instrument,
to cancel the designation in favor of the killer, whether or
not the decedent was then empowered to designate the
decedent in place of the killer and whether or not the
decedent then had capacity to exercise the power.
2. An individual who feloniously and intentionally
kills the decedent forfeits all benefits with respect to the

SB 1690 2
decedent's estate, including an intestate share, an elective
share, an omitted spouse's or child's share, a homestead
allowance, exempt property, and a family allowance. If the
decedent died intestate, the decedent's intestate estate
passes as if the killer disclaimed the intestate share.
3. The felonious and intentional killing of the
decedent:
(1) Revokes any revocable:
(a) Disposition or appointment of property made by the
decedent to the killer in a governing instrument;
(b) Provision in a governing instrument conferring a
general or nongeneral power of appointment on the killer; and
(c) Nomination of the killer in a governing
instrument, nominating or appointing the killer to serve in
any fiduciary or representative capacity, including a
personal representative, executor, trustee, or agent; and
(2) Severs the interests of the decedent and killer in
property held by them at the time of the killing as joint
tenants with the right of survivorship, transforming the
interests of the decedent and killer into equal tenancies in
common.
4. A severance under subdivision (2) of subsection 3
of this section does not affect any third-party interest in
property acquired for value and in good faith reliance on an
apparent title by survivorship in the killer unless a
writing declaring the severance has been noted, registered,
filed, or recorded in records appropriate to the kind and
location of the property which are relied upon, in the
ordinary course of transactions involving such property, as
evidence of ownership.
5. Provisions of a governing instrument are given
effect as if the killer disclaimed all provisions revoked by

SB 1690 3
this section or, in the case of a revoked nomination in a
fiduciary or representative capacity, as if the killer
predeceased the decedent.
6. A wrongful acquisition of property or interest by a
killer not covered by this section shall be treated in
accordance with the principle that a killer cannot profit
from the killer's wrong.
7. After all right to appeal has been exhausted, a
judgment of conviction establishing criminal accountability
for the felonious and intentional killing of the decedent
conclusively establishes the convicted individual as the
decedent's killer for purposes of this section. In the
absence of a conviction, the court, upon the petition of an
interested person, shall determine whether, under the
preponderance of evidence standard, the individual would be
found criminally accountable for the felonious and
intentional killing of the decedent. If the court
determines that, under that standard, the individual would
be found criminally accountable for the felonious and
intentional killing of the decedent, the determination
conclusively establishes that individual as the decedent's
killer for purposes of this section.
8. (1) A payor or other third-party is not liable for
having made a payment or transferred an item of property or
any other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing
instrument affected by an intentional and felonious killing,
or for having taken any other action in good faith reliance
on the validity of the governing instrument, upon request
and satisfactory proof of the decedent's death, before the
payor or other third-party received written notice of a
claimed forfeiture or revocation under this section. A
payor or other third-party is liable for a payment made or

SB 1690 4
other action taken after the payor or other third-party
received written notice of a claimed forfeiture or
revocation under this section.
(2) Written notice of a claimed forfeiture or
revocation under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
mailed to the payor's or other third-party's main office or
home by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested, or served upon the payor or other third-party in
the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon
receipt of written notice of a claimed forfeiture or
revocation under this section, a payor or other third-party
may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit any item of
property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction
of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent's
estate, or if no proceedings have been commenced, to or with
the court having jurisdiction of probate proceedings
relating to decedents' estates located in the county of the
decedent's residence. The court shall hold the funds or
100 item of property and, upon its determination under this
101 section, shall order disbursement in accordance with the
102 determination. Payments, transfers, or deposits made to or
103 with the court discharge the payor or other third-party from
104 all claims for the value of amounts paid to or items of
105 property transferred to or deposited with the court.
106 9. (1) A person who purchases property for value and
107 without notice, or who receives a payment or other item of
108 property in partial or full satisfaction of a legally
109 enforceable obligation, is neither obligated under this
110 section to return the payment, item of property, or benefit
111 nor is liable under this section for the amount of the
112 payment or the value of the item of property or benefit.
113 But a person who, not for value, receives a payment, item of

SB 1690 5
114 property, or any other benefit to which the person is not
115 entitled under this section is obligated to return the
116 payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally
117 liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the
118 item of property or benefit, to the person who is entitled
119 to it under this section.
120 (2) If this section or any part of this section is
121 preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item
122 of property, or any other benefit covered by this section, a
123 person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of
124 property, or any other benefit to which the person is not
125 entitled under this section is obligated to return the
126 payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally
127 liable for the amount of the payment or the value of the
128 item of property or benefit, to the person who would have
129 been entitled to it were this section or part of this
130 section not preempted.
✓